District of Columbia statutes.
29-308.20

Amendment by board of directors or shareholders.

(a)

A corporation’s shareholders may amend or repeal the corporation’s bylaws.

(1)

The articles of incorporation, § 29-308.21 or, if applicable, § 29-308.22 reserve that power exclusively to the shareholders in whole or part; or

(2)

The shareholders in amending, repealing, or adopting a bylaw expressly provide that the board of directors shall not amend, repeal, or reinstate that bylaw.

(b)

A corporation’s board of directors may amend or repeal the corporation’s bylaws, unless:

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720